Hawaii statutes.
§281-19 Hearings, attendance,
examinations. If any person subpoenaed as a witness to attend before the
liquor commission or liquor control adjudication board, or to produce any
books, papers, or records called for by the process of the commission or board,
fails or refuses to respond thereto, or refuses to answer questions propounded
by any member of the commission or board or its counsel material to the matter
pending before the commission or board, the circuit court of the circuit within
which the licensed premises involved are situated, upon request of the
commission or board, shall have power to compel obedience to any process of the
commission or board and require the witness to answer questions put to the
witness, and to punish, as a contempt of the court, any refusal to comply
therewith without good cause shown therefor.

False swearing by any witness before the
commission or board, shall constitute perjury and be punished as such, and
whenever the commission or board is satisfied that a witness has sworn falsely
in any hearing or investigation before the commission or board, it shall report
the same to the prosecuting officer for prosecution. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §9; RL
1935, §2578; RL 1945, §7229; RL 1955, §159-18; HRS §281-19; gen ch 1985; am L
1998, c 249, §9]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next